Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7005
Tax credit; how claimed; excess; how treated.

(1) A taxpayer shall claim the tax credit by attaching the tax credit certification received from the department under section 77-7004 to the taxpayer's tax return.

(2) Any credit in excess of the taxpayer's tax liability shall be refunded to the taxpayer. In lieu of claiming a refund, the taxpayer may elect to have the excess carried forward to subsequent taxable years. A taxpayer may carry forward the excess tax credits until fully utilized.

Laws 2022, LB1261, § 5.